Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-1,119
Local law, ordinance, resolution, or rule; penalty for drinking or intoxication; prohibited.

(1) No county, municipality, or other political subdivision may adopt or enforce a local law, ordinance, resolution, or rule having the force of law that includes drinking, being a common drunkard, or being found in an intoxicated condition as one of the elements of the offense giving rise to a criminal or civil penalty or sanction.

(2) No county, municipality, or other political subdivision may interpret or apply any law of general application to circumvent subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1978, LB 593, § 2.